Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.305

Alternative educational service providers—Student eligibility.

(1) The board of directors of school districts may contract with alternative educational service providers for eligible students. Alternative educational service providers that the school district may contract with include, but are not limited to:

(a) Other schools;

(b) Alternative education programs not operated by the school district;

(c) Education centers;

(d) Skills [Skill] centers;

(e) The Washington national guard youth challenge program;

(f) Dropout prevention programs; or

(g) Other public or private organizations, excluding sectarian or religious organizations.

(2) Eligible students include students who are likely to be expelled or who are enrolled in the school district but have been suspended, are academically at risk, or who have been subject to repeated disciplinary actions due to behavioral problems.

(3) If a school district board of directors chooses to initiate specialized programs for students at risk of expulsion or who are failing academically by contracting out with alternative educational service providers identified in subsection (1) of this section, the school district board of directors and the organization must specify the specific learning standards that students are expected to achieve. Placement of the student shall be jointly determined by the school district, the student's parent or legal guardian, and the alternative educational service provider.

(4) For the purpose of this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules for reporting and documenting enrollment. Students may reenter at the grade level appropriate to the student's ability. Students who are sixteen years of age or older may take a test to earn a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536 in accordance with rules adopted under RCW 28A.305.190.

(5) The board of directors of school districts may require that students who would otherwise be suspended or expelled attend schools or programs listed in subsection (1) of this section as a condition of continued enrollment in the school district.

[ 2013 c 39 s 3; 2002 c 291 s 1; 1997 c 265 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 265: See note following RCW 13.40.160.